Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1415.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4 of the act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 4. Powers and duties of Environmental Quality Board.* * *(d) Testing requirement.--The Environmental Quality Board shall require each entry point for a public water system to be tested at least once per year for levels of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances, regardless of previous test results for an entry point.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516171819